Washington statutes.
RCW 10.40.190

Refusal to answer.

If the defendant fail or refuse to answer the indictment or information by demurrer or plea, a plea of not guilty must be entered by the court.

[ 1891 c 28 s 62; Code 1881 s 1061; 1873 p 232 s 224; 1854 p 116 s 88; RRS s 2115.]